Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1950.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 39.04 RCW to read as follows:(1) For all public works projects governed under this chapter, if a subcontractor that is certified by the office of minority and women's business enterprises under chapter 39.19 RCW is unable to timely make any required employer contributions to a Taft-Hartley trust due to a contractor or subcontractor violating the requirements of RCW 39.04.250, the contractor or subcontractor that violated RCW 39.04.250 shall promptly indemnify the subcontractor that was unable to make the contributions to the Taft-Hartley trust for any fees or other penalties associated with the subcontractor's failure to make timely contributions to the Taft-Hartley trust.(2) This section applies to contracts entered or renewed on or after the effective date of this section.--- END ---